Hawaii statutes.
§352-8 Guardianship and custody of the
person committed. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
director shall be the guardian of every youth committed to or received at the
Hawaii youth correctional facilities. The director shall have all the powers
and duties of a natural guardian of the youth; provided that the director shall
not be liable in damages for the tortious acts committed by the youth.

(b) The director shall have custody of any
committed person who is eighteen years of age or older for the period provided
for by the court. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1); am L 2004, c 161, §36]

Case Notes

State has duty to exercise reasonable care in its supervision
of persons committed to its custody. 61 H. 369, 604 P.2d 1198 (1979).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next